Wisconsin, session 2025, AB593.
do enact as follows:AB593,11Section 1. 7.33 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,2,1127.33 (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each local 3governmental unit, as defined in s. 16.97 (7), may, and each state agency shall, upon 4proper application under sub. (3), permit each of its employees to serve as an 5election official under s. 7.30 without loss of fringe benefits or seniority privileges 6earned for scheduled working hours during the period specified in sub. (3), without 7loss of pay for scheduled working hours during the period specified in sub. (3) except 8as provided in sub. (5), and without any other penalty. For employees who are 9included in a collective bargaining unit for which a representative is recognized or 10certified under subch. V or VI of ch. 111, this subsection shall apply unless 11otherwise provided in a collective bargaining agreement.AB593,212Section 2. 13.111 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,2,151313.111 (2) Duties. The joint committee on employment relations shall 14perform the functions assigned to it under subch. subchs. V and VI of ch. 111, 15subch. II of ch. 230, and ss. 16.53 (1) (d) 1., 20.916, 20.917, and 20.923.AB593,316Section 3. 16.50 (3) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,3,3116.50 (3) (e) No pay increase may be approved unless it is at the rate or within 2the pay ranges prescribed in the compensation plan or as provided in a collective 3bargaining agreement under subch. V or VI of ch. 111.AB593,44Section 4. 19.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,3,13519.82 (1) “Governmental body” means a state or local agency, board, 6commission, committee, council, department or public body corporate and politic 7created by constitution, statute, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-8governmental corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment 9corporation; a local exposition district under subch. II of ch. 229; a long-term care 10district under s. 46.2895; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the foregoing, 11but excludes any such body or committee or subunit of such body which is formed for 12or meeting for the purpose of collective bargaining under subch. I, IV, or V, or VI of 13ch. 111.AB593,514Section 5. 19.85 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,3,181519.85 (3) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to authorize a 16governmental body to consider at a meeting in closed session the final ratification or 17approval of a collective bargaining agreement under subch. I, IV, or V, or VI of ch. 18111 which has been negotiated by such body or on its behalf.AB593,619Section 6. 19.86 of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,4,22019.86 Notice of collective bargaining negotiations. Notwithstanding s. 2119.82 (1), where notice has been given by either party to a collective bargaining 22agreement under subch. I, IV, or V, or VI of ch. 111 to reopen such agreement at its 23expiration date, the employer shall give notice of such contract reopening as 1provided in s. 19.84 (1) (b). If the employer is not a governmental body, notice shall 2be given by the employer’s chief officer or such person’s designee.AB593,73Section 7. 20.425 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,4,5420.425 (1) (a) General program operations. The amounts in the schedule for 5the purposes provided in subchs. I, IV, and V, and VI of ch. 111 and s. 230.45 (1).AB593,86Section 8. 20.425 (1) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,4,19720.425 (1) (i) Fees, collective bargaining training, publications, and appeals. 8The amounts in the schedule for the performance of fact-finding, mediation, 9certification, and arbitration functions, for the provision of copies of transcripts, for 10the cost of operating training programs under ss. 111.09 (3), 111.71 (5m), and 11111.94 (3), for the preparation of publications, transcripts, reports, and other copied 12material, and for costs related to conducting appeals under s. 230.45. All moneys 13received under ss. 111.09 (1) and (2), 111.70 (4) (d) 3. b., 111.71 (1) and (2), 111.83 14(3) (b), 111.94 (1) and (2), 111.9993, and 230.45 (3), all moneys received from 15arbitrators and arbitration panel members, and individuals who are interested in 16serving in such positions, and from individuals and organizations who participate 17in other collective bargaining training programs conducted by the commission, and 18all moneys received from the sale of publications, transcripts, reports, and other 19copied material shall be credited to this appropriation account.AB593,920Section 9. 20.505 (1) (ks) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,5,82120.505 (1) (ks) Collective bargaining grievance arbitrations. The amounts in 22the schedule for the payment of the state’s share of costs related to collective 23bargaining grievance arbitrations under s. 111.86 and related to collective 1bargaining grievance arbitrations under s. 111.993. All moneys received from state 2agencies for the purpose of reimbursing the state’s share of the costs related to 3grievance arbitrations under s. 111.86 and to reimburse the state’s share of costs for 4training related to grievance arbitrations, and all moneys received from 5institutions, as defined in s. 36.05 (9), for the purpose of reimbursing the state’s 6share of the costs related to grievance arbitrations under s. 111.993 and to 7reimburse the state’s share of costs for training related to grievance arbitrations 8shall be credited to this appropriation account.AB593,109Section 10. 20.505 (1) (kz) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,5,161020.505 (1) (kz) General program operations. The amounts in the schedule to 11administer state employment relations functions and the civil service system under 12subch. subchs. V and VI of ch. 111 and ch. 230, to pay awards under s. 230.48, and 13to defray the expenses of the state employees suggestion board. All moneys received 14from state agencies for materials and services provided by the division of personnel 15management in the department of administration shall be credited to this 16appropriation.AB593,1117Section 11. 20.917 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,5,211820.917 (3) (b) This subsection applies to employees in all positions in the civil 19service, including those employees in positions included in collective bargaining 20units under subch. V or VI of ch. 111, whether or not the employees are covered by 21a collective bargaining agreement.AB593,1222Section 12. 20.921 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,6,32320.921 (1) (a) 2. If the state employee is a public safety employee under s. 1111.81 (15r), or an employee represented by a collective bargaining unit under s. 2111.825 (1r) (a) to (e) or (f) or (1t) (a) to (e) or (f), payment of dues to employee 3organizations.AB593,134Section 13. 20.923 (6) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,6,9520.923 (6) Salaries set by appointing authorities. (intro.) Salaries for the 6following positions may be set by the appointing authority, subject to restrictions 7otherwise set forth in the statutes and the compensation plan under s. 230.12, 8except where the salaries are a subject of bargaining with a certified representative 9of a collective bargaining unit under s. 111.91 or 111.998:AB593,1410Section 14. 36.09 (1) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,7,101136.09 (1) (j) Except where such matters are a subject of bargaining with a 12certified representative of a collective bargaining unit under s. 111.91 or 111.998, 13the board shall establish salaries for persons prior to July 1 of each year for the next 14fiscal year, and shall designate the effective dates for payment of the new salaries. 15In the first year of the biennium, payments of the salaries established for the 16preceding year shall be continued until the biennial budget bill is enacted. If the 17budget is enacted after July 1, payments shall be made following enactment of the 18budget to satisfy the obligations incurred on the effective dates, as designated by 19the board, for the new salaries, subject only to the appropriation of funds by the 20legislature and s. 20.928 (3). This paragraph does not limit the authority of the 21board to establish salaries for new appointments. The board may not increase the 22salaries of employees under this paragraph unless the salary increase conforms to 23the proposal as approved under s. 230.12 (3) (e) or the board authorizes the salary 1increase to recognize merit, to correct salary inequities under par. (h), to fund job 2reclassifications or promotions, or to recognize competitive factors. The granting of 3salary increases to recognize competitive factors does not obligate inclusion of the 4annualized amount of the increases in the appropriations under s. 20.285 (1) for 5subsequent fiscal bienniums. No later than October 1 of each year, the board shall 6report to the joint committee on finance and the secretary of administration and 7administrator of the division of personnel management in the department of 8administration concerning the amounts of any salary increases granted to 9recognize competitive factors, and the institutions at which they are granted, for the 1012-month period ending on the preceding June 30.AB593,1511Section 15. 40.02 (25) (b) 8. of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,7,141240.02 (25) (b) 8. Any other state employee for whom coverage is authorized 13under a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to subch. V or VI of ch. 111 or 14under s. 230.12 or 233.10.AB593,1615Section 16. 40.05 (4g) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,7,211640.05 (4g) (a) 4. Has received a military leave of absence under s. 230.32 (3) 17(a) or 230.35 (3), under a collective bargaining agreement under subch. V or VI of 18ch. 111 or under rules promulgated by the administrator of the division of personnel 19management in the department of administration or is eligible for reemployment 20with the state under s. 321.64 after completion of his or her service in the U.S. 21armed forces.AB593,1722Section 17. 40.80 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,8,2140.80 (3) Any action taken under this section shall apply to employees covered 2by a collective bargaining agreement under subch. V or VI of ch. 111.AB593,183Section 18. 40.81 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,8,5440.81 (3) Any action taken under this section shall apply to employees covered 5by a collective bargaining agreement under subch. IV or, V, or VI of ch. 111.AB593,196Section 19. 111.81 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,8,177111.81 (1) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual 8obligation of the state as an employer, by its officers and agents, and the 9representatives of its employees, to meet and confer at reasonable times, in good 10faith, with respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in s. 111.91 (1), with 11respect to public safety employees and employees represented by a collective 12bargaining unit under s. 111.825 (1r) (a) to (e) or (f) or (1t) (a) to (e) or (f), and to the 13subjects of bargaining provided in s. 111.91 (3), with respect to general employees, 14with the intention of reaching an agreement, or to resolve questions arising under 15such an agreement. The duty to bargain, however, does not compel either party to 16agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession. Collective bargaining 17includes the reduction of any agreement reached to a written and signed document.AB593,2018Section 20. 111.81 (9g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,8,2119111.81 (9g) “General employee” means an employee who is not a public safety 20employee or an employee who is represented by a collective bargaining unit under s. 21111.825 (1r) (a) to (e) or (f) or (1t) (a) to (e) or (f).AB593,2122Section 21. 111.81 (12m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,9,723111.81 (12m) “Maintenance of membership agreement” means an agreement 1between the employer and a labor organization representing public safety 2employees or a collective bargaining unit under s. 111.825 (1r) (a) to (e) or (f) or (1t) 3(a) to (e) or (f) which requires that all of the public safety employees whose dues are 4being deducted from earnings under s. 20.921 (1) or 111.84 (1) (f) at the time the 5agreement takes effect shall continue to have dues deducted for the duration of the 6agreement, and that dues shall be deducted from the earnings of all public safety 7such employees who are hired on or after the effective date of the agreement.AB593,228Section 22. 111.81 (16) of the statutes is amended to read:AB593,9,179111.81 (16) “Referendum” means a proceeding conducted by the commission 10in which public safety employees in a collective bargaining unit may cast a secret 11ballot on the question of directing the labor organization and the employer to enter 12into a fair-share or maintenance of membership agreement or to terminate such an 13agreement or a proceeding conducted by the commission in which employees 14represented by a collective bargaining unit under s. 111.825 (1r) (a) to (e) or (f) or 15(1t) (a) to (e) or (f) may cast a secret ballot on the question of directing the labor 16organization and the employer to enter into a maintenance of membership 17agreement or to terminate such an agreement.AB593,2318Section 23. 111.825 (5) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab593 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab593 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB593 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB593 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB593: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting